District of Columbia statutes.
13-401

Relation to other provisions of law.

Except in cases of irreconcilable conflict, this chapter shall be construed to augment, and not to repeal, any other law of the District of Columbia authorizing another basis of jurisdiction or permitting another procedure for service in civil proceedings in the District of Columbia courts.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 548, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-401.
1973 Ed., § 13-401.